Oklahoma, session 2026, SB338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-401.1 of Title 29, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Pursuant to Section 5-401 of Title 29 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, the Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission shall limit


a person licensed to hunt and harvest whitetail deer in this state


to bag or possess no more than one (1) antlered whitetail deer per


year.


B. The provisions of this section shall not apply to persons


licensed to hunt and harvest whitetail deer in a commercial hunting


area.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-176 MR 1/2/2025 4:36:05 PM

Req. No. 176 Page 1